Alaska statutes. Title 10. Corporations and Associations.
Article 16. Miscellaneous Provisions.

Sec. 10.50.800.
Company certificates.

An operating agreement of a limited liability company may authorize the company to issue a certificate as evidence of a limited liability company interest. An operating agreement may also authorize and provide for the assignment or transfer of the interest represented by the certificate.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.810.
Submission of documents to department.

When a document is required or allowed to be delivered to or filed with the department under this chapter, the person delivering the document shall deliver to the department the required fee, the original signed document, and an exact copy of the document.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.820.
Filing of documents by department.

If the department determines that a document filed under this chapter conforms to the filing requirements of this chapter, the department shall

mark on the original signed document and on the exact copy the word “filed” and the date and time of the document’s acceptance for filing;

retain the original signed document in the department’s files; and

return the exact copy to the person who filed the document or to the person’s representative.

The department may not file a document if the requirements of this section are not met.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.830.
Disapproval of writing by department; appeal.

If the department fails to approve articles of organization, amendment, merger, consolidation, or dissolution, or any other document required by this chapter to be approved by the department, the department shall, within 10 days after the delivery of the document to the department, give written notice of disapproval to the person, limited liability company, or foreign limited liability company, delivering the document, and specifying the reasons for disapproval. The person or company may appeal the disapproval to the superior court.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.840.
Execution of documents.

Unless otherwise provided in this chapter, a document required by this chapter to be filed with the department by or for a limited liability company shall be signed by

a manager of the company if the company is managed by a manager;

a member of the company if the articles of organization do not provide that the company is managed by a manager;

a person organizing the company if the company is not organized;

the fiduciary if the company is controlled by a receiver, trustee, or other court-appointed fiduciary.

A person signing a document filed with the department under this chapter shall state beneath or opposite the signature the person’s name and the capacity in which the person signs.

A person signing a document filed with the department under this chapter may sign as an attorney-in-fact, but is not required to provide or file with the department a document authorizing the person to act as attorney-in-fact for the signing of a document.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.850.
Filing and other fees.

The department shall charge fees established by the department by regulation adopted under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) for

filing the original articles of organization;

filing an amendment of registration;

filing articles of merger or consolidation;

filing articles of dissolution;

issuing a document not otherwise covered by this section;

furnishing a copy of a document;

accepting an application for reservation of a name, or filing a notice of the transfer or cancellation of a name reservation;

filing a statement of change of address for a registered office or registered agent;

accepting service of a notice, demand, or process upon the department;

filing the application for registration of a foreign limited liability company;

registering a name, reserving a name, or renewing a name registration under this chapter; or

filing another document allowed or required under this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Administrative Code. —

For corporations, partnerships, and other business organizations, see 3 AAC 16.

Sec. 10.50.860.
Maintenance of records.

Unless otherwise provided in an operating agreement, a limited liability company shall keep at its main office

current and past lists that state in alphabetical order the full name and last known mailing address of every member and manager of the company;

a copy of the company’s articles of organization and amendments to the articles, including a signed copy of a power of attorney used by a person who signed articles of amendment for the company;

a copy of the company’s federal, state, and local income tax returns and financial statements, if any, for the three most recent years or, if the returns and statements are not prepared, a copy of the information and statements provided to, or that should have been provided to, the members to enable the members to prepare their federal, state, and local tax returns for the three-year period;

a copy of any effective operating agreement of the company, amendments to the agreement, and former operating agreements;

unless contained in an operating agreement,

a document stating the amount of cash contributed by a member of the company, the agreed value of other property or services contributed by a member, and when a member is to make additional contributions;

a document stating the events, if any, that cause the company to be dissolved and its affairs wound up; and

other documents that an operating agreement requires the company to prepare.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.870.
Inspection of records.

A limited liability company shall make its books and records of account, or certified copies of them, reasonably available for inspection and copying at its registered office or principal office in the state by a member of the company. Member inspection shall be upon written demand stating with reasonable particularity the purpose of the inspection. The inspection may be in person or by agent or attorney, at a reasonable time and for a proper purpose. Only books and records of account, minutes, and the record of members directly connected to the stated purpose of the inspection may be inspected or copied.

A manager, or, if the company is not managed by a manager, a member, who, or a limited liability company that, refuses to allow a member, or the agent or attorney of the member, to examine and make copies from its books and records of account, minutes, and record of members, for a proper purpose, is liable to the member for a penalty in the amount of 10 percent of the value of the limited liability company interests owned by the member or $5,000, whichever is greater, in addition to other damages or remedy given the member by law. It is a defense to an action for penalties under this section that the person suing has within two years sold or offered for sale a list of members of the company or any other limited liability company or has aided or abetted a person in procuring a list of members for this purpose, or has improperly used information secured through a prior examination of the books and records of account, minutes, or record of members of the company or any other limited liability company, or was not acting in good faith or for a proper purpose in making the person’s demand.

Nothing in this chapter impairs the power of a court, upon proof by a member of a demand properly made and for a proper purpose, to compel the production for examination by the member of the books and records of account, minutes, and record of members of a limited liability company.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.880.
Disclosure of information.

The members of a limited liability company, if the articles of organization do not provide that the company is managed by a manager, or the manager of the company, if the articles of organization provide that the company is managed by a manager, shall provide, to the extent just and reasonable under the circumstances, true and full information of all matters that affect the members of a company to a member or to the legal representative of a deceased member or a member under a legal disability.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.890.
Waiver of notice.

If notice is required to be given to a member or manager of a limited liability company under the provisions of this chapter or under the provisions of the articles of organization or an operating agreement of the company, a waiver of the notice in writing signed by the person entitled to notice, whether before or after the time stated for notice, is equivalent to the giving of notice.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)